District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.55

Conflict of interest.

Panel members shall be subject to the conflict of interest and disclosure requirements established by §§ 1-1162.23 and 1-1162.24. Any member affiliated with an organization providing services to children or families, as an officer, director, partner, employee, consultant, or contractor, shall recuse himself or herself from any discussion of specific cases that involve the organization, and shall also recuse himself or herself from any discussion of findings or recommendations that involve the organization.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IIIB, § 355
as added Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-341, § 2(m), 52 DCR 2315
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124,§ 501(j), 59 DCR 1862

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-124 substituted “§§ 1-1162.23 and 1-1162.24” for “§§ 1-1106.01 and 1-1106.02”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(j) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).